New Jersey, session 221, A1832.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1998, c.121 (C.17:16T-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  Notwithstanding any other law, regulation or common law to the contrary, a financial institution [may]shall release the financial records regarding a customer's account to [a law enforcement agency,] a county adult protective services provider[, or both] if: [a.] (1) A vulnerable customer or a senior customer has a beneficial interest in the account either wholly or in part; and [b.] (2) The financial institution suspects that illegal activity is, or will be, taking place which involves the account including, but not limited to, defrauding any vulnerable or senior customer who has a beneficial interest in the account. b.    A county adult protective services provider receiving financial records from a financial institution pursuant to subsection a. of this section may release the records to a law enforcement agency, if deemed necessary. (cf: P.L.1998, c.121, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.